Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 7 LEVY AND COLLECTION OF ASSESSMENTS
§ 43-714A. Definitions.

Words and terms used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, are defined as follows:

“District” means an irrigation district organized under the provisions of title 43, Idaho Code.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

“Treasurer” means the duly appointed officer of an irrigation district, and his or her deputies or employees. Such treasurer acts as ex officio tax collector for the purposes of this chapter.

The term “delinquent assessments” as herein used shall be deemed and construed to include all general and special assessments and charges for operation and maintenance, bond or loan contract payments, or other authorized expenditures, entered in irrigation district assessment rolls, not paid when due, and collectible in the manner provided in chapter 7, title 43, Idaho Code.

“Facsimile” means the reproduction or supplying of an exact copy from an original document.

“Party in interest” means a person or persons, partnership, corporation, business venture, or other entity that holds a recorded purchase contract, mortgage, deed of trust, or lease in and for the property for which a delinquency entry has been made. For purposes of notice requirements in this chapter, recording includes documents recorded in full or by memorandum providing notice thereof.

“Record owner or owners” means the person or entity in whose name or names the property stands upon the records in the county recorder’s office. Where the record owners are husband and wife at the time the notice described in section 43-717, Idaho Code, shall issue, notice to one (1) spouse shall be deemed and imputed as notice to the other spouse.

“Tax certificate” means a written assignment of a district’s right to a tax deed as provided in section 43-715, Idaho Code.

Party In Interest.

Although a personal representative of a potential purchaser was the only person to receive written notice of the pending issuance of a tax deed, he was neither the record owner nor a party in interest, and, thus, the irrigation district did not comply with the statutory requirements, because it failed to serve proper notice. The tax deed was void ab initio, and the district did not have the authority to transfer the deed to the purchasers, who had no claim on the property. Salladay v. Bowen, 161 Idaho 563, 388 P.3d 577 (2017).

§ 43-715. Delinquent assessments — Sale of rights to tax deed — Purchaser’s rights after redemption period.

After the delinquency list has been filed with the county recorder and prior to the expiration of the period of redemption, the board may by written assignment convey its right to tax deed on any delinquency entry to any person paying to the treasurer the amount of such delinquency entry, together with the penalty and interest to the date of assignment as required in case of redemption. Whereupon, the treasurer shall note such assignment opposite the entry on his list of delinquency entries and in case of subsequent redemption thereof, he shall pay the amount so received in redemption to the assignee upon surrender of the tax certificate reassigned to the district; provided, however, that no assignment shall be made unless all prior assessments against the lands covered by such delinquency entry be first fully paid.

When the board exercises its discretionary assignment rights under subsection (1) of this section, any person shall be entitled to become a purchaser of the rights of the district in any unredeemed delinquency entry and the board shall make to the purchaser a proper tax certificate therefor upon receipt of said sums in cash.

After the expiration of the period of redemption, the owner of any tax certificate shall be entitled to tax deed thereon upon delivering to the treasurer his tax certificate from the district, with proper assignments from any previous owner; or, in case of the loss of the tax certificate, of satisfactory proof that he is the owner of the tax certificate; provided, that notice of the pending issuance of tax deed has been served as required by section 43-717, Idaho Code, and that, after compliance with section 43-719(1) or (2), Idaho Code, the board has directed the treasurer to issue the tax deed. Any tax certificate upon which tax deed has not been claimed by the owner of the tax certificate within two (2) years from the expiration of the period of redemption shall become null and void.

§ 43-716. Delinquent assessments — Issuance of tax deed — General provisions.

If the property is not redeemed within three (3) years from the date of delinquency entry, the treasurer of the district or his successor in office must make to the district or to the owner of the tax certificate, a tax deed to the property. However, the district or the owner of the tax certificate shall not be entitled to a tax deed for such property until;[:] (1) a notice of pending issuance of tax deed be served, as required in section 43-717, Idaho Code; and (2) an affidavit of compliance be filed, as required in section 43-718, Idaho Code.

§ 43-717. Delinquency entries — Service of notice of pending issuance of tax deed — Exclusive procedure for judicial review.

The treasurer of the district wherein the property for which a tax deed may issue, or the owner of the tax certificate, shall serve or cause to be served written notice of pending issuance of tax deed upon the record owner or owners and parties in interest of record in the following exclusive manner:

By serving or causing to be served a copy of such notice by certified mail with return receipt demanded upon the record owner or owners and parties in interest of record at their last known address, such service of notice to be made no more than five (5) months nor less than two (2) months before the time set for the tax deed to issue;

In the event that such notice is served as above described and returned undelivered and after reasonable and diligent search and inquiry in attempting to locate and serve the record owner or owners and parties in interest of record, then by publishing a summary of such notice in a newspaper having general circulation in the county wherein the property is situated. Such publication must be made at least once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks, the last publication of which is to be no more than two (2) months nor less than fourteen (14) days before the time set for the tax deed to issue.

For purposes of paragraph (b) of this section, an examination of the ownership records maintained by the assessor of the county in which the property is located in accordance with section 63-307, Idaho Code, and an examination of the current telephone directory for the area where the property is located, shall be deemed a reasonable and diligent search and inquiry in attempting to locate and serve the record owner or owners and parties in interest of record.

The record owner or owners and parties in interest of record shall be liable for and shall pay to the treasurer or to the owner of the tax certificate all reasonable costs and fees in the preparation, service and publication of such notice and such reasonable costs shall become a lien upon the property in favor of the district or the owner of the tax certificate and shall be added to the delinquent assessment.

Such notice and summary thereof must contain the following items:

The name and last known address of the record owner or owners;

An accurate description of the property for which the delinquency entry has been made, or, in lieu thereof, the irrigation district assessment number assigned to the property in the assessment roll of the district, and either:

The year for which the assessment was levied and for which the assessment is delinquent;

An itemized statement showing assessment, penalty, interest and all costs and fees incident to the delinquency entry and such notice up to and including the date of the making of such notice;

The date the delinquency entry was made;

The time, date, place at which, and by whom the tax deed will issue; and

A statement that the record owner or owners or any party in interest shall have adequate opportunity to be heard by the board, to confront and cross-examine any evidence or witness against the record owner or owners, and obtain and present evidence on behalf of the record owner or owners or any party in interest. Such statement shall also contain notice of to whom written inquiries and objections shall be directed concerning the notice and information contained therein and by what date such inquiries and objections must be received. Verbal inquiries and objections shall not be considered for any purpose.

A statement that a hearing before the board and judicial review of the board’s decision are the exclusive remedies for challenging the issuance of the tax deed and that no other action can be taken to determine the validity of a properly executed tax deed and that the tax deed conveys complete title to the described land to the grantee named in the tax deed.

Judicial review of a decision of the board as provided in section 43-719(2), Idaho Code, shall be the exclusive method for judicial determination of the regularity of all proceedings from the assessment by the board, inclusive, up to the execution of the tax deed, and no separate or independent action shall lie for the determination of the regularity of those proceedings.

Any party in interest may file a written request for such notice in the office of the treasurer of the district wherein the property for which the delinquency entry has been made is situated. Such request shall contain the following items:

The name and address of the record owner or owners;

An accurate description of the property covered by the interest, or, in lieu thereof, the irrigation district assessment number used in assessing the same;

The name and address of the party in interest;

An accurate description of the interest held; and

The date of termination of the interest held.

If a record owner or owners or a party in interest shall have actual knowledge of the notice of pending issuance of a tax deed or that issuance of a tax deed is pending, it shall be deemed sufficient notice under this section.

Service shall be deemed completed upon depositing the certified mailing containing the original or a copy of the notice of pending issuance of tax deed with return receipt demanded in any United States post office mail box, or upon physical delivery of such notice or copy thereof by the treasurer or by the owner of the tax certificate or by appointed agent of either, to the record owner or owners or party in interest, or upon the date of last publication.

i. A street address or other information which would be of assistance to the public in ascertaining the location of the property; or

ii. The name and telephone number of a person, firm or business office from whom information concerning the location of the property may be obtained;

§ 43-718. Affidavit of compliance.

At least five (5) days before the tax deed is to be issued, the treasurer or the owner of the tax certificate shall make an affidavit of compliance stating that he or she has complied with the conditions of issuance of notice of pending issuance of tax deed described in section 43-717, Idaho Code, and stating particularly the facts relied on as constituting such compliance.

Such affidavit shall be delivered to the secretary of the district to be by such officer entered on the records of his or her office and carefully preserved among the files of such office. The treasurer or the owner of the tax certificate shall also cause to be filed with the secretary of the district an affidavit by the publisher of each newspaper in which notice of the pending issuance of the tax deed was printed and published, which affidavits of publication shall be filed and preserved among the files of the office of such secretary. Such record or affidavit shall be prima facie evidence that such notice has been given.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally swears falsely to facts averred in such affidavit shall be guilty of perjury and be punished by [a] fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300).

§ 43-719. Delinquent assessments — Hearing and issuance of tax deed.

When a record owner or owners or any party in interest upon whom a notice of pending issuance of tax deed is served or who has actual knowledge of such notice or its contents fails to appear or otherwise defend and answer at the time set for hearing in such notice and it is made to appear to the board that the owner of the tax certificate or the treasurer has fulfilled the requirements of sections 43-717 and 43-718, Idaho Code, the board shall, without further notice to the record owner or owners or any party in interest upon whom such notice has been served or who has actual knowledge of such notice and its contents, immediately direct that the treasurer shall issue a tax deed in favor of the district or the owner of the tax certificate, as the case may be.

When a record owner or owners or any party in interest upon whom such notice is served or who has actual knowledge of such notice or its contents appears or answers at the date specified in such notice, the board shall consider documentary evidence and hear testimony and make a final decision in writing. Such final decision shall be mailed by certified mail, return receipt demanded, to all parties shown by the record of the proceedings to be affected by the board’s action. If the board shall find that the owner of the tax certificate or the treasurer has conformed to the requirements of sections 43-717 and 43-718, Idaho Code, and that a delinquent assessment was owing on the property described and that such delinquency has not been paid, the board shall immediately direct that the treasurer issue a tax deed in favor of the district or the owner of the tax certificate, as the case may be. Such final decision shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law.

A record of the proceeding shall be kept and entered into the district’s minute book.

Any person who is aggrieved by a final decision of the board concerning the issuance of a tax deed is entitled to have that decision reviewed by the district court of the judicial district wherein the property described is located by filing a petition in the district court within thirty (30) days after receipt of the final decision of the board. Such filing does not itself stay enforcement of the board’s decision; however, the board may grant, or the reviewing court may order, a stay upon appropriate terms. Review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record in the district’s minute book. The court may reverse or modify the decision of the board if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the board’s finding, conclusions or decisions are:

Made upon unlawful procedure;

Clearly erroneous in view of reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record;

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions; or

In excess of the statutory authority of the district.

§ 43-720. Tax deed — Recitals — Effect as evidence — Title conveyed.

The matters recited in the delinquency entry must be recited in the deed, and such deed duly acknowledged or proved is prima facie evidence that:

Benefits were apportioned to the property as required by law or water rights were properly allocated to the property.

The assessment was levied in accordance with law.

The assessment was equalized as required by law.

The assessment, together with statutory penalties, interest and any other charges, was unpaid.

At the proper time the delinquency entry was made as prescribed by law and by the proper officer.

The property was unredeemed within the time allowed by the first paragraph of section 43-712, Idaho Code.

The person who executed the tax deed was the proper officer. Such deed duly acknowledged and proved is prima facie evidence of the regularity of all other proceedings for the assessment, inclusive, up to the execution of the deed. The deed conveys to the grantee the absolute title to the lands described therein, free of all encumbrances, except purchase contracts, mortgages, deeds of trust or leases of record to the holders of which notice as has not been sent as in this chapter provided, any lien for assessments that have attached subsequent to the assessment resulting in the issuance of the tax deed, and any lien for state and county taxes. For purposes of this section, the term “encumbrances” does not include any easements, highways or rights-of-way of any type, whether public or private.

Any number of descriptions of land in the same district may be included in one (1) deed where the certificates are held by one (1) person, or the district.

§ 43-721. Tax deed as evidence.

Such deed duly acknowledged and proved, is prima facie evidence of the regularity of all other proceedings, from the assessment by the secretary inclusive, up to the execution of the deed.

§ 43-722. Application of preceding sections.

The provisions of sections 43-708 to 43-718[, Idaho Code], inclusive, shall apply to all assessments of irrigation districts organized and existing under chapters 1 to 15, inclusive, of this title, which are levied in the year 1925 and subsequent years.

Provided that the provisions of sections 43-708 to 43-718[, Idaho Code], inclusive, shall not apply to irrigation districts which have arranged for the collection of the district assessments by county officers under the provisions of sections 43-727 to 43-729[, Idaho Code], inclusive.

§ 43-723. Application of sections replaced.

Sections 4391, 4395, 4396, 4397, 4398, and 4400 of the Compiled Statutes of Idaho, section 4390 as amended by House Bill 29; passed at this session of the legislature, and sections 4392, 4393, 4394 and 4401, as amended by this act, shall not apply to assessments levied in the year 1925 and subsequent years, but shall be continued in force and effect for the purpose of proceedings under any assessments levied prior to the year 1925.

§ 43-724. Tax deed — Short form.

Upon the expiration of the period of redemption, the treasurer shall execute to the district or the holder and owner of any tax certificate a deed to the property described in said certificate, which deed shall recite that in consideration of the amount of tax (specifying the amount) for the year (naming the year) the treasurer transfers to the holder of said certificate the property therein described. Such deed shall be duly acknowledged by the treasurer and shall be bona fide evidence of the full compliance by the district and of all its officers with every act and thing required to be done as a condition to the issuance of said deed and of the full compliance with the law prerequisite to the execution of a valid tax deed and that the property has not been redeemed. Any number of descriptions of land in the same district may be included in one deed where the certificates are held by one person, or the district.

§ 43-725. State lands subject to assessment.

Lands belonging to the state to which an irrigation district has apportioned benefits pursuant to the provisions of this title shall be subject to the applicable provisions of this title for the levy and collection of assessments for such benefits.

§ 43-726. Sale for assessments — Limitation of actions to determine validity — Tender.

Every action, suit or proceeding which may be commenced for the purpose of determining the validity of a tax deed, brought by the original owner of the land or his assigns against the grantee named in the tax deed or his assigns, or to quiet title against him or them, or to remove the cloud of the tax deed, or to recover the possession from the tax deed grantee in possession, in cases where the assessment for which the land was sold had been paid before the issuance of the tax deed or the land redeemed after the issuance of the tax deed, or the lands were not subject to taxation at the time of assessment shall be commenced within two (2) years from the date of the issuance of the tax deed; and in every such action, suit or proceeding, whether before or after the issuance of tax deed, the party claiming to be the owner as against the district or against a party claiming under the tax certificate or under the tax deed shall tender with the first pleading in such action, suit or proceeding, and pay into court at the time of filing the same, the amount of the purchase price for which such lands were sold, or the amount of the assessment, penalties and interest for which a tax deed was issued to the district, together with all taxes and assessments which have been paid by the purchaser or paid or assessed by the district on said land after issuance of the tax deed, together with interest thereon at the rate of ten per cent (10%) per annum from the respective time of payment of such sums up to the time of filing of such pleading, the same, or such portion thereof as the court shall find to be just, to be paid to the district or said purchaser, his heirs or assigns, in case the right or title of the district or said purchaser shall fail in such suit, action or proceeding.

§ 43-727. County officers — Collection of district assessments.

The board of directors of any irrigation district organized under the laws of this state desiring to provide for the collection of district assessments by the county officers instead of the district treasurer, may do so by adopting a resolution providing for such collection by the county officers, and furnishing a copy thereof to the county auditor of each county in which any of the district lands are located:[;] provided, that the county commissioners of said county or counties, must first by unanimous vote concur in and agree to such resolution by a proper resolution made and entered upon the minutes of such board or boards of county commissioners. Such resolution may provide that only assessments against lands subdivided into tracts of four (4) acres or less shall be collected by the county officers. In addition to collection fees otherwise provided by law, the county commissioners may levy an additional fee against the irrigation district for the cost of transferring records and initiating the collection process. After the adoption of such resolution the board of directors of such district shall furnish the county auditor of each county in which any part of the district lands are located a duplicate or certified copy of any apportionment of benefits which has been made, and copy of the list or map showing said apportionment theretofore made in such district, and a notice of any district bond issue or district contract with the United States, stating clearly the amount thereof, the rate of interest, and the conditions of payment, and each year thereafter shall furnish the said auditor or auditors a certified copy, or duplicate, of any additional apportionment, including any annual apportionment for operation and maintenance purposes, and shall each year furnish such auditor or auditors a certified copy, or duplicate of the levy or assessment made by the order of said board of directors for operation and maintenance purposes, including organization expenses and maintenance of the district organization. All tracts benefited to the same extent, on a proportionate basis, by the water rights and irrigation system of the district, and by the operation and maintenance thereof, shall be included in a separate category plainly identified in the list showing said apportionment of benefits. After the receipt of said copy of such resolution of the board of directors of any irrigation district, the county auditor shall each year enter upon the county assessment roll against the property therein described the levy so made by the board of directors of said district as shown upon the copy or duplicate thereof furnished to the said auditor as above provided, in manner similar to that in which other municipal school or road district assessments are entered by him on said assessment roll, except that the sum assessed and charged against each description of land therein contained for such irrigation district purposes shall be entered by the auditor as the operation and maintenance assessment of the . . . . irrigation district against the same. Such district operation and maintenance tax shall be collected and accounted for by the county officers in the same manner as other municipal taxes and paid over to the district treasurer together with any penalties or interest collected thereon, and the collection thereof shall be enforced in the same manner, and neglect to pay the same shall be subject to the same penalties as the other taxes of the county:[;] provided, however, that the collection of such district assessments by such county officers, as herein provided, shall not make the bonds, contracts and interests due from such irrigation districts the obligation of such county or counties.

§ 43-728. County officers — District bond and contract obligations — Levy and collection of assessments.

After receipt of said notice of bond issues and contracts with the United States it shall be the duty of the county auditors of each county in which any of such district lands are located to furnish the board of county commissioners at or before its meeting on the second Monday in September, a statement showing the amount of the annual payment on said bonds or contract and the amount of interest thereon which will fall due during the next ensuing year should the board of directors adopt such a resolution. It shall be the duty of the board of county commissioners, or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties in which such district lands are located to levy on the lands in said district the tax necessary to meet the annual payment on said bonds or contracts and the interest thereon as they become due. If said district includes lands in more than one county, the board of county commissioners of each county shall levy upon the district lands in that county the proportionate part of the total tax necessary to meet the annual payment on said bonds or contract and the interest thereon as they become due, in the proportion that the benefits apportioned to the district lands in such county are of the total benefits of such bond issue or contract apportioned to all the lands of the district, and whether the district be one or more than one county, the levy upon each of the several tracts of district lands for the payment of the annual instalments on said bonds or contract and the interest thereon shall be in proportion to the apportionment of benefits of such bond issue or contract and apportioned among the several tracts of land in the district in like manner as provided by law with reference to similar levies made by the boards of directors of irrigation districts. The county auditor of each county in which such district lands are located shall each year enter upon the county assessment roll against the property therein described the levy so made by the board of county commissioners, in manner similar to that in which school or other municipal or road district assessments are entered by him on said assessment roll, except that the sum assessed and charged against each description of land therein contained for such irrigation district purposes shall be entered by the auditor as the bond or contract assessment of the . . . . irrigation district against the same. Such district bond or contract tax shall be collected and accounted for by the county officers in the same manner as other municipal taxes and the collection thereof shall be enforced in the same manner, and neglect to pay the same shall be subject to the same penalties as the other taxes of the county and the same shall be paid over to the state treasurer who shall act as treasurer of the district for the purpose of receiving and depositing such funds and disbursing the same in payment of the district’s bond and United States contract obligations and the interest thereon.

§ 43-729. Collection by county officers — Reversion to plan of collection by district treasurer.

Any district having made provision for such collection of district taxes by the county officers, and desiring to revert to the plan of collection of district taxes by the district treasurer, may do so by adopting a resolution revoking such former resolution providing for collection by the county officers and furnishing copy thereof to the county auditors of each county in which any part of the district lands are located, except that in the case of any district which may have entered into contract with any of the purchasers of its bonds or obligations, or their representatives, or with the United States, providing for collection by the county officers, or have caused to be printed or indorsed upon any of its bonds a statement that the collection of the funds for the payment of the principal or interest thereof, will be made by the county officers, then such resolution providing for collection by the county officers shall be irrevocable until such obligations of the district have been paid.

§ 43-730. Contracts with cities, irrigation lateral districts or other entities in lieu of charges, levies and assessments.

The board of directors of an irrigation district shall have the power to enter into a contract in writing with any city, irrigation lateral district or other entity whose boundaries or service area is situated within the boundaries of any irrigation district where water has been purchased, or is being furnished, or shall be furnished, for lands, property or use within the boundaries or service area of such city, irrigation lateral district or other entity by an irrigation district, whereby such city, irrigation lateral district or other entity shall become obligated to pay charges, levies and assessments now provided to be made pursuant to chapter 7, title 43, sections 43-701 through 43-729, Idaho Code, and amendments thereto in lieu of the directors of the irrigation district making said charges, levies and assessments.

§ 43-731. Water held in trust.

Upon entering into any such contract, the city, irrigation lateral district or other entity obligated to make the payments as aforesaid shall hold said water in trust for the purpose for which the same was, or shall be, purchased or furnished.

§ 43-732. Certain lands may be assessed at different amounts — Additional service charge.

Notwithstanding any provision of sections 43-701 and 43-1824, Idaho Code, to the contrary, an irrigation district that assesses land in the district under the provisions of chapters 7 and 18, title 43, Idaho Code, may assess any land within the district to which the district furnishes or supplies water for irrigation purposes that:

Lies above the level of the canals or ditches of the district and is irrigated by pumping by the landowner;

Is irrigated by a partial, supplemental or intermittent supply of water from the district; or

Is irrigated by water of the district that is subject to prior use by other lands within the district;

Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 43-701 and 43-1824, Idaho Code, to the contrary, an irrigation district that assesses land in the district under the provisions of chapters 7 and 18, title 43, Idaho Code, may, at the discretion of the board of directors, assess a service charge in addition to the regular assessment, against subdivided and small-tract lands that have appurtenant water rights and to which irrigation water is furnished or is available for delivery, when delivery of water to these lands requires operation, construction and maintenance costs substantially greater than operation, construction and maintenance costs involved in delivering water to the majority of other lands in the district. All such small-tract or subdivided lands shall be placed in groupings of one (1) acre or less, or more than one (1) acre but not more than ten (10) acres, and each grouping shall be assessed as a single class.

in such amount as the board determines to be just, taking into consideration the benefit to the land assessed and extra expenses, if any, of the landowner or holder in using such water, but such amount may not exceed the amount assessed against irrigable acres lying below the level of the canals or ditches of the district.

§ 43-733. Assessments for measures to protect district facilities.

Notwithstanding any provision of title 43, Idaho Code, to the contrary, an irrigation district may determine that it is necessary to impose a special assessment to pay for physical structures or other work necessary to protect its facilities from harm caused by irrigation runoff or drainage from individual lands within the district that are on the district’s assessment book prepared under section 43-701, Idaho Code. The district may issue a special assessment on such lands to perform such protective work only if the district has adopted a bylaw or resolution authorizing a special assessment for protection of district facilities from irrigation runoff or drainage from such individual lands, after notice to the landowner. When an assessment for such protective work has been authorized, the district shall assess such individual lands that are the source of irrigation runoff or drainage, the cost of such protective measures, including the annual cost of maintenance of any necessary repairs or maintenance of such protective measures, in addition to the assessments that are levied for the delivery of water to the individual landowners, and the same provisions shall apply with regard to delinquent assessments, as in the case of assessments levied for the delivery of water. The special assessments authorized under this section are subject to review by the board of corrections under section 43-703, Idaho Code.